Texas, session 891, HB203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 11.173, Water Code, is amended by adding Subsections (c) and (c-1) to read as follows: (c)  At least once every five years, the commission shall: (1)  analyze permits, certified filings, and certificates of adjudication under which all or part of the water authorized to be appropriated has not been put to beneficial use at any time during the immediately preceding 10-year period; and (2)  prepare and submit to the board, the Parks and Wildlife Department, and the Legislative Budget Board a written report that: (A)  identifies permits, certified filings, and certificates of adjudication analyzed under Subdivision (1) for which an exemption from cancellation is provided under Subsection (b); (B)  identifies permits, certified filings, and certificates of adjudication analyzed under Subdivision (1) that may be subject to cancellation under Subsection (a); and (C)  for each permit, filing, or certificate identified under Paragraph (B), specifies: (i)  the volume of water associated with the permit, filing, or certificate; (ii)  whether an action for cancellation of the permit, filing, or certificate has been initiated by the commission; and (iii)  whether the water associated with the permit, filing, or certificate may be appropriate for dedication to the Texas Water Trust established under Section 15.7031. (c-1)  The commission shall submit the initial report required by Subsection (c) not later than March 31, 2027. This subsection expires September 1, 2027. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.